District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-304

Composition or compromise of partner with creditors on dissolution — Partners’ right of contribution.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1415, ch. 854, § 1497
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(9), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-304.
1973 Ed., § 41-204.